District of Columbia statutes.
44-776

Repealed

Report of loss of privileges by health care providers.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-106, § 8, 23 DCR 8737
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(b), 30 DCR 5778
1981 Ed., § 32-106.
1973 Ed., § 32-305a.